Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,121
Commission; personnel; executive director; duties; assistance from other agencies; exempt from personnel system.

The commission shall employ an executive director and may employ a general counsel and such other staff as are necessary to carry out its duties pursuant to the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the commission and shall be solely responsible to it. The executive director shall be responsible for the administrative operations of the commission and shall perform such other duties as may be delegated or assigned to him or her by the commission, except that the commission shall not delegate the making of regulations to the executive director. The commission may obtain the services of experts and consultants as necessary to carry out its duties pursuant to the act. Unless prohibited by law, the Tax Commissioner, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Attorney General, and the county attorneys shall make available to the commission such personnel, facilities, and other assistance as the commission may request. Members of the commission shall be exempted from the provisions of Chapter 81, article 13, except that they may be covered by the State Personnel System through specific agreement between the commission and the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 121;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 18;

Laws 1983, LB 479, § 4;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 4.